en: Biokreis
xx: Biokreis

en: Danish state-controlled organic, Red Ø
da: Ø-mærke, Statskontrolleret økologisk
fi: Tanskan Ø-luomumerkki
sv: Danskt Ø-märkt

en: Luomu - controlled organic production
fi: Aurinkomerkki, Luomu - valvottua tuotantoa
sv: Solmärket, Luomu - kontrollerad ekoproduktion

en: Finnish organic association
fi: Leppäkerttumerkki, Luomuliitto
sv: Nyckelpigamärket

en: Tún certified organic
fi: Tùn sertifioitu luomu
is: Vottað lífrænt - Tún

en: Debio organic
xx: Debio økologisk
da: Debio Ø-mærket
fi: Debio luomu
nb: Debio Ø-merke
sv: Debio Ø-märkt

ca: Categoria Extra
en: “Extra” Class, extra class
de: Klasse “Extra”, Klasse Extra
es: Categoría “Extra”
fi: "Ekstra"-luokka
fr: Catégorie “Extra”, catégorie supérieure, catégorie extra
it: Classe &quot;Extra&quot;

sv: KRAV, KRAV-certifierad ekologisk ingrediens, KRAV-godkänd ekologisk råvara, KRAV-ekologisk råvara
xx: KRAV

de: ÖKO-TEST
xx: ÖKO-TEST

de: ÖKO-TEST sehr gut
xx: ÖKO-TEST sehr gut

de: ÖKO-TEST gut
xx: ÖKO-TEST gut

en: DIO, Inspection and Certification Organization of Organic Products
xx: DIO, Inspection and Certification Organization of Organic Products

en: ActForPlanet
fr: ActforPlanet, ActPlanet

en: conservation international, ci
xx: conservation international, ci

en: too good to go
xx: too good to go

en: Class I, class 1
ca: Classe I
de: Klasse I
es: Categoría I
fi: 1. luokka
fr: Catégorie I, bonne qualité, catégorie 1
it: Classe I
nl: Klasse
pt: Classe I, classe 1
th: คลาส 1

en: Class II, class 2
ca: Categoria II, Categoria 2
de: Klasse II
es: Categoría II
fi: 2. luokka
fr: Catégorie II, qualité marchande, catégorie 2
it: Classe II
pt: Classe II, classe 2

en: No palm oil, Palm oil free, Without palm oil
bg: Без палмово масло
ca: Lliure d'oli de palma, Sense oli de palma
cs: Bez palmového oleje
de: Ohne Palmöl, palmölfrei
es: Sin aceite de palma
fi: palmuöljytön, ei palmuöljyä, ilman palmuöljyä
fr: Sans huile de palme
he: ללא שמן דקלים, נקי משמן דקלים
hr: bez palminog ulja
hu: Pálmaolajmentes, Pálmaolaj nélkül, pálmaolajat nem tartalmaz
it: Senza olio di palma
nl: Zonder palmolie, Palmolie-vrij, Palmolievrij
pl: Wolne od oleju palmowego, bez oleju palmowego
pt: Sem óleo de palma, 0% óleo de palma
ru: Без пальмового масла
sv: Utan palmolja, palmoljefri
th: ไม่ใช้น้ำมันปาล์ม
zh: 不含棕榈油

en: Contains palm oil
bg: Съдържа палмово масло
fr: Contient de l'huile de palme
it: Contiene olio di palma
nl: Bevat palmolie
pl: Zawiera olej palmowy, Z olejem palmowym
pt: Contém óleo de ppalma, com óleo de palma

en: PDO, P.D.O., Protected Designation of Origin
bg: ЗНП, Защитено наименование за произход
ca: DOP, Denominació d'Orígen Protegida
da: BOB, B.O.B, Beskyttet oprindelsesbetegnelse
de: gU, g.U., Geschützte Ursprungsbezeichnung
es: DOP, D.O.P., Denominación de Origen Protegida
fi: SAN, S.A.N., Suojattu alkuperänimitys
fr: AOP, A.O.P., Appellation d'origine protégée
hr: ZOI, Z.O.I., zaštićena oznaka izvornosti
hu: OEM, Oltalom alatt álló redetmegjelölés
it: DOP, D.O.P., Denominazione di origine protetta
nl: BGO, Beschermde Geografische Oorsprong, PDO, AOP
pt: DOP, D.O.P., Denominação de Origem Protegida
sv: SUB, S.U.B., Skyddad ursprungsbeteckning